Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.53
Videotape and film rentals; satellite programming and service; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state from the sale or rental of videotape and film rentals, satellite programming, and satellite programming service when the sales tax or the admission tax is charged under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and except as provided in section 77-2704.39.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 68.